District of Columbia statutes.
43-111

Exemption from taxation and sale on execution.

The property of any such corporation, its grounds, lots, and appliances, shall be exempt from taxation and shall not be liable to sale on execution.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1295, ch. 854, § 667
1981 Ed., § 27-111.
1973 Ed., § 27-111.